District of Columbia statutes.
47-127

Payment of fees into Treasury.

Fees collected by the District of Columbia shall be paid for each fiscal year into the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 184, ch. 182, § 10
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
Apr. 24, 1926, 44 Stat. 322, ch. 176, § 1
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-127.
1973 Ed., § 47-126.